Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Article 1. In General

Editor's notes. —

The article 1 designation and title have been added at the direction of the Wyoming legislative service office.

§ 34-1-101.
“Purchaser” defined.

The term “purchaser”, as used in this act shall be construed to embrace every person to whom any estate or interest in real estate shall be conveyed for a valuable consideration, and also every assignee of a mortgage or lease, or other conditional estate.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 20; R.S. 1887, § 23; R.S. 1899, § 2729; C.S. 1910, § 3621; C.S. 1920, § 4577; R.S. 1931, § 97-102; C.S. 1945, § 66-123; W.S. 1957, § 34-1.

Cross references. —

As to recordation of probate judgments and decrees relating to real estate, see §

2-2-301

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act,” appearing in this section, refer to ch. 1, Laws 1882, which appears herein as this section and §§

34-1-102

to

34-1-108

,

34-1-110

to

34-1-113

, 34-1-115, 34-1-116,

34-1-118

to

34-1-123

,

34-1-126

to

34-1-128

,

34-1-130

,

34-1-132

,

34-1-135

and

34-1-136

.

Mortgagees are considered “purchasers” entitled to bona fide purchaser protection.

Moreover, a lender who takes a mortgage on land has given value despite the fact that the “value” advanced is expected to be repaid. First Interstate Bank v. First Wyo. Bank, N.A., 762 P.2d 379,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1988).

Mortgagees are considered “purchasers” for purposes of the recording statute. —

District court properly granted summary judgment to a bank under Wyo. R. Civ. P. 56 in a mortgage foreclosure action because it would have been improper to apply the doctrine of equitable subrogation to allow a refinancing mortgagee to be subrogated to the priority lien position held by an original mortgagee as W.S. §

34-1-121

was clearly a filing date priority statute and the refinancing mortgagee, which was considered a purchaser under this statute, had constructive notice of a prior lien held by a bank.
Countrywide Home Loans, Inc. v. First Nat'l Bank of Steamboat Springs, 2006 WY 132, 144 P.3d 1224,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(2006).

Assignees were purchasers, but not bona fide purchasers. —

Trial court properly dismissed assignees' action against defendants for a declaration that an easement was void; the assignees, who were “purchasers” within the meaning of the recording act, could not demonstrate that they were bona fide purchasers, where the assignment itself reflected a defect in the title, i.e., it was retained by the State of Wyoming. Any effort to check the records would have revealed that the assignor lacked the ability to convey legal title.
Bentley v. Dir. of the Office of State Lands & Invs., 2007 WY 94, 160 P.3d 1109,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2007).

Pleading good faith purchase. —

If it is necessary to plead purchase in good faith in action to quiet title by grantee in subsequently executed but first recorded deed from same grantor, it is plaintiff-grantee's duty to do it. York v. James, 60 Wyo. 222, 148 P.2d 596,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1944).

Burden of proving good faith purchase on subsequent grantee. —

Burden to prove that he was purchaser in good faith for valuable consideration and without notice is upon grantee under subsequent conveyance which is first recorded in quiet title action. York v. James, 60 Wyo. 222, 148 P.2d 596,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1944).

Issue of consideration raised. —

In quiet title action by grantee in subsequently executed but first recorded deed from same grantor, where plaintiff did not plead source of title and defendant denied plaintiff's title, question of consideration for subsequent deed was put in issue as near as possible in view of pleadings. York v. James, 60 Wyo. 222, 148 P.2d 596,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1944).

Effect of recital of consideration. —

Recitals of consideration in subsequently executed but first recorded deed from same grantor are not evidence of consideration against first grantee, except where parties to subsequent conveyance are dead. York v. James, 60 Wyo. 222, 148 P.2d 596,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1944).

Inadequate consideration. —

Payment by attorney to client of nine dollars and some cents for taxes client had paid during year and absorbing $15.00 charge to client for writing 3 or 4 letters concerning grazing lease and for taking notary to client was not fair or adequate consideration for deed to 320 acres of homestead realty. York v. James, 62 Wyo. 184, 165 P.2d 109,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1946).

Insufficient notice of prior conveyance. —

Provision in recorded lease of land for drilling water wells that lease payments should be made to lessors personally or in care of witness to instrument or deposited to lessors' credit in such witness' account was not enough to put subsequent purchaser on notice of previous unrecorded conveyance to such witness. York v. James, 62 Wyo. 184, 165 P.2d 109,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1946).

Defective assignment of palpable error noticed. —

Assignment of palpable error though defective in form will be noticed by supreme court where cursory examination of record shows judgment is not sustained by any evidence and is contrary to law. York v. James, 60 Wyo. 222, 148 P.2d 596,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1944).

Law reviews. —

See “Quitclaim Holder as a Bona Fide Purchaser,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 306.

§ 34-1-102.
“Conveyance” defined.

The term “conveyance”, as used in this act, shall be construed to embrace every instrument in writing by which any estate or interest in real estate is created, alienated, mortgaged or assigned, or by which the title to any real estate may be affected in law or in equity, except wills, leases for a term not exceeding three (3) years, executory contracts for the sale or purchase of lands, and certificates which show that the purchaser has paid the consideration and is entitled to a deed for the lands, and contain a promise or agreement to furnish said deed at some future time.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 21; R.S. 1887, § 24; R.S. 1899, § 2728; C.S. 1910, § 3620; C.S. 1920, § 4576; R.S. 1931, § 97-101; C.S. 1945, § 66-124; W.S. 1957, § 34-2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

34-1-101

.

The transfer of title by eminent domain is not a conveyance

within the meaning of this section. State ex rel. State Highway Comm'n v. Meeker, 75 Wyo. 210, 294 P.2d 603,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1956).

Purchasers were not bona fide. —

Trial court properly dismissed assignees' action against defendants for a declaration that an easement was void; the assignees, who were “purchasers” within the meaning of the recording act, could not demonstrate that they were bona fide purchasers, where the assignment itself reflected a defect in the title, i.e., it was retained by the State of Wyoming. Any effort to check the records would have revealed that the assignor lacked the ability to convey legal title.
Bentley v. Dir. of the Office of State Lands & Invs., 2007 WY 94, 160 P.3d 1109,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2007).

Lease executed by agent. —

A lease for a term not exceeding 3 years, purported to be executed by an agent, was not rendered inadmissible in evidence against principal because no authority under seal was shown to have been given the agent. Marshall v. Rugg, 6 Wyo. 270, 44 P. 700,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1896).

Authorization to use right-of-way through lease. —

Court properly concluded that a lease and its concomitant authorization for an easement holder to use the right-of-way was efficacious where the easement holder already had a second right-of-way through acquisitions of rights-of-way held by its predecessors in interest, and the easement holder's use of another entity's right-of-way did not create a significant additional burden to that right-of-way or the interest a landowner had in it. In addition, the landowner cited no pertinent authority nor did he make a cogent argument that the circumstances amounted to a violation of the statute of frauds that invalidated the lease agreement between a television station and the easement holder. Cundy v. Range Tel. Coop., Inc., 2005 WY 153, 123 P.3d 901,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2005).

Eviction by false representation. —

Under 5 year lease containing clause, that if any part of the real estate is sold, lease may be terminated at any yearly period on 90 days notice, falsely representing a sale and cancelling lease was not necessarily deceit, but plaintiff might maintain an action for breach of contract or tort on theory of eviction by false representations. Diamond Cattle Co. v. Clark, 52 Wyo. 265, 74 P.2d 857,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1937).

Construction of recording laws. —

Recording laws should not be construed so as to produce fraud. Hawkins v. Stoffers, 40 Wyo. 226, 276 P. 452,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1929).

Attachment of acknowledged description to unacknowledged escrow agreement. —

An escrow agreement, although not recordable because unacknowledged, does not become recordable by purchaser's attachment to it of his acknowledged description and, when recorded, does not constitute constructive notice to subsequent purchasers of initial purchaser's interest. Low v. Sanger, 478 P.2d 60,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1970).

Failure to record executory contract for sale or purchase of land. —

It is true that an executory contract for the sale or purchase of land is not by statute required to be recorded, and therefore, failure to record such an instrument does not vitiate it as to subsequent purchasers — interests thus engendered being determined according to general principles of law and equity, which give weight to numerous common-law maxims, including the one that, “he who is first in time has the better right.” However, the mere chronology of transactions is not sufficient to bring such principles to play in favor of a defendant. Low v. Sanger, 478 P.2d 60,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1970).

Possession as notice of interest in land. —

Where purchaser in good faith was in possession when deed by vendor given to another company was placed of record, and purchaser was shown by evidence not to know anything of deed until thereafter, such possession held to give notice to world of interest in land, and such deed was absolutely void as to him. Hawkins v. Stoffers, 40 Wyo. 226, 276 P. 452,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1929).

Quoted

in

Ayres Jewelry Co. v. O & S Bldg., 419 P.2d 628,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1966); Marple v. Wyoming Prod. Credit Ass'n, 750 P.2d 1315,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1988); Star Valley Ranch Ass'n v. Daley, 2014 WY 116,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Sept. 17, 2014).

Stated

in

Laramie Printing Trustees v. Krueger, 437 P.2d 856,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1968).

Cited

in

Wyoming Dep't of Revenue & Taxation-Excise Tax Div. v. First Wyo. Bank, 718 P.2d 31,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 540

(Wyo. 1986); Foster v. Wicklund, 778 P.2d 118,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1989); Horse Creek Conservation Dist. v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Ag, 2009 WY 143, 221 P.3d 306,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Nov. 23, 2009).

Law reviews. —

See “Recording the Land Contract,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 208.

See “Quitclaim Holder as a Bona Fide Purchaser,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 306.

See “A Possible Bar to Implied Covenants in Wyoming Oil and Gas Leases,” 11 Wyo. L.J. 57.

For comment, “Landlord-Tenant Reform: Toward a Warranty of Habitability for Leased Residential Premises in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 765 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Deeds: description of land conveyed by reference to river or stream as carrying to thread or center or only to bank thereof — modern status, 78 ALR3d 604.

§ 34-1-103.
Letters of attorney; not a conveyance.

The preceding section [§

34-1-102

] shall not be construed to extend to a letter of attorney, or other instrument, containing a power to convey lands as agent or attorney for the owner of such lands.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 22; R.S. 1887, § 25; R.S. 1899, § 2730; C.S. 1910, § 3622; C.S. 1920, § 4578; R.S. 1931, § 97-103; C.S. 1945, § 66-125; W.S. 1957, § 34-3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Real estate broker's authority under power of attorney to execute contract for sale on behalf of principal, 43 ALR2d 1014.

§ 34-1-104.
Letters of attorney; recordation; effect as evidence.

Every letter of attorney, or other instrument, containing a power to convey lands as agent or attorney for the owner of such lands, and every executory contract for the sale or purchase of lands, only when acknowledged by such owner, may be recorded by the county clerk of any county in which the lands to which such letter, instrument or contract relates, or any part of such lands, may be situated, and when so acknowledged, and the record thereof when recorded, or a transcript of such record duly certified, may be read in evidence in the same manner and with like effect as a conveyance recorded in such county.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 22; R.S. 1887, § 25; R.S. 1899, § 2755; C.S. 1910, § 3647; C.S. 1920, § 4603; Laws 1931, ch. 28, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 97-128; C.S. 1945, § 66-127; W.S. 1957, § 34-4; Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

Cross references. —

As to introduction in evidence of instruments concerning real estate, see §

34-1-123

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “county clerk” for “register of deeds.”

A power of attorney is not required for an agent to accept a conveyance

of mining claims, since this section only applies to a conveyance by an agent. North Am. Uranium v. Johnston, 77 Wyo. 332, 316 P.2d 325,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1957).

Alteration of unrecordable instrument to make it recordable. —

It would be strange indeed if the person to whom a transfer is made by an unacknowledged and thereby unrecordable instrument could unilaterally and to his own benefit alter such an instrument so as to make it recordable. The legislature did not intend the statutes to permit this result nor should such interpretation be countenanced in equity. Low v. Sanger, 478 P.2d 60,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1970).

Failure to record executory contract for sale or purchase of land. —

It is true that an executory contract for the sale or purchase of land is not by statute required to be recorded, and therefore, failure to record such an instrument does not vitiate it as to subsequent purchasers — interests thus engendered being determined according to general principles of law and equity, which give weight to numerous common-law maxims, including the one that, “he who is first in time has the better right.” However, the mere chronology of transactions is not sufficient to bring such principles to play in favor of a defendant. Low v. Sanger, 478 P.2d 60,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1970).

Attachment of acknowledged description to unacknowledged escrow agreement. —

An escrow agreement, although not recordable because unacknowledged, does not become recordable by purchaser's attachment to it of his acknowledged description and, when recorded, does not constitute constructive notice to subsequent purchasers of initial purchaser's interest. Low v. Sanger, 478 P.2d 60,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1970).

Law reviews. —

See “Recording the Land Contract,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 208.

§ 34-1-105.
Letters of attorney; recordation; when revocation valid.

No letter of attorney, or other instrument so recorded, shall be deemed to be revoked by any act of the party by whom it was executed, unless the instrument containing such revocation be also recorded in the same office in which the instrument containing the power was recorded.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 23; R.S. 1887, § 26; R.S. 1899, § 2756; C.S. 1910, § 3648; C.S. 1920, § 4604; R.S. 1931, § 97-129; C.S. 1945, § 66-128; W.S. 1957, § 34-5.

Cited

in

Boswell v. First Nat'l Bank, 16 Wyo. 161, 92 P. 624 (1907).

§ 34-1-106.
Form and capacity of conveyances.

Conveyances of land or of any estate or interest therein, may be made by instrument executed and acknowledged by the party from whom or which the estate or interest is intended to pass.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2731; C.S. 1910, § 3623; C.S. 1920, § 4579; R.S. 1931, § 97-104; Laws 1943, ch. 76, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 66-101; W.S. 1957, § 34-6.

Holders of construction permits. —

Where holders of permits to construct an irrigation ditch executed instruments purporting to “transfer, sell, release” and “transfer, sell, assign, and set over” all their right and title to appropriation, such instruments, though not acknowledged and recorded as required, were sufficient to pass title as between parties. Whalon v. North Platte Canal & Colonization Co., 11 Wyo. 313, 71 P. 995,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1903).

Cited

in

Marshall v. Rugg, 6 Wyo. 270, 44 P. 700,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 14

, 33 L.R.A. 679 (1896); Ohio Oil Co. v. Wyoming Agency, 63 Wyo. 187, 179 P.2d 773,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1947).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effectiveness of reservation of vendor's crop rights in land contracts in absence of such reservation in deed later executed, 8 ALR2d 565.

§ 34-1-107.
Quitclaim deed.

A deed of quitclaim and release shall be sufficient to pass all the estate which the grantor could lawfully convey by deed of bargain and sale.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 2733; C.S. 1910, § 3625; C.S. 1920, § 4581; R.S. 1931, § 97-106; C.S. 1945, § 66-103; W.S. 1957, § 34-7.

Cross references. —

As to form and effect generally of quitclaim deed, see §§

34-2-104

,

34-2-105

.

As to effect of quitclaim deed without the word “release,” see §

34-2-106

.

Disqualified witness. —

A deed is good between parties, notwithstanding disqualified witness. Huber v. Glenrock State Bank, 32 Wyo. 357, 231 P. 63,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 32 Wyo. 357, 234 P. 31,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1925).

Applied

in

S & G Investors, LLC v. Blackley, 994 P.2d 941,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For a note, “Quitclaim Holder as a Bona Fide Purchaser,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 306.

§ 34-1-108.
Married women; right to convey generally.

A married woman may, by her deed or mortgage, convey her real estate in like manner as she might, if she were an unmarried woman.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2732; C.S. 1910, § 3624; C.S. 1920, § 4580; R.S. 1931, § 97-105; C.S. 1945, § 66-102; W.S. 1957, § 34-8.

Cross references. —

For provision that conveyance or encumbrance of homestead void unless wife joins, and as to exception thereto, see §

34-2-121

.

As to power of married women to convey, etc., property and to contract, see §

20-1-202

.

Cited

in

Fox v. Fox, 75 Wyo. 390, 296 P.2d 252,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1956).

§ 34-1-109.
Married women; right to convey all interest in land divested from husband; effect of conveyance.

In all cases where the interest of the husband in any tract or parcel of land has been, or shall be, divested by process of law, or by voluntary conveyance or otherwise, the wife may, by her separate deed, release and convey to the purchaser, his heirs or grantees, all her interest in such tract or parcel of land, whether in possession or expectancy, in the same manner as though she were sole and unmarried; and any deed by the wife so executed and acknowledged, shall be a valid and sufficient bar in law and equity to any right or choice of dower, or other interest which she may thereafter assert in such premises.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 75, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4139; C.S. 1910, § 4999; C.S. 1920, § 6269; R.S. 1931, § 89-3933; C.S. 1945, § 3-7201; W.S. 1957, § 34-9.

Cross references. —

As to rights and liabilities of married person generally, see §§

20-1-201

,

20-1-202

.

Editor's notes. —

As enacted, this section contained a first sentence which read: “A married woman may relinquish her dower in any of the real estate of her husband in a deed, mortgage, conveyance, power of attorney, release, or other disposition thereof.” The 1899 revisor and all subsequent revisors omitted such sentence.

Dower abolished. —

This and other sections were cited to the effect that dower has been abolished in this state. France v. Connor, 3 Wyo. 445, 27 P. 569,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1891), aff'd, 161 U.S. 65, 16 S. Ct. 497, 40 L. Ed. 619, 1896 U.S. LEXIS 2138 (U.S. 1896).

Cited

in

Fox v. Fox, 75 Wyo. 390, 296 P.2d 252,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1956).

§ 34-1-110.
Married women; conveyance by nonresident.

When any married woman, not residing in this state, shall join her husband in any conveyance of real estate situated within this state, the conveyance shall have the same effect as if she were sole, and the acknowledgment of proof of the execution of such conveyance by her, may be the same as if she were sole.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 11; R.S. 1887, § 13; R.S. 1899, § 2747; C.S. 1910, § 3639; C.S. 1920, § 4595; R.S. 1931, § 97-120; C.S. 1945, § 66-113; W.S. 1957, § 34-10.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Nash v. Cowhick, 9 Wyo. 93, 60 P. 265,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1900); Fox v. Fox, 75 Wyo. 390, 296 P.2d 252,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1956).

§ 34-1-111.
Conveyance by tenant for life.

A conveyance made by a tenant for life or years, purporting to grant a greater estate than he possessed or could lawfully convey, shall not work a forfeiture of his estate, but shall pass to the grantee all the estate which such tenant could lawfully convey.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 2736; C.S. 1910, § 3628; C.S. 1920, § 4584; R.S. 1931, § 97-109; C.S. 1945, § 66-104; W.S. 1957, § 34-11.

§ 34-1-112.
Claim of adverse possession not to invalidate conveyance.

No grant or conveyance of lands or interest therein shall be void, for the reason that at the time of the execution thereof, such land shall be in the actual possession of another, claiming adversely.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 2735; C.S. 1910, § 3627; C.S. 1920, § 4583; R.S. 1931, § 97-108; C.S. 1945, § 66-107; W.S. 1957, § 34-12.

Cross references. —

As to Marketable Title Act not affecting rights acquired by adverse possession, see §

34-10-104

.

As to establishment of public highways generally, and as to creation by adverse possession, etc., see §

24-1-101

.

Cited

in

Freeman v. Crout, 1 Wyo. 360, 1 Wyo. 361,

1877 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1877).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Public records as notice of adverse possession in life tenant as against remaindermen or reversioners, 58 ALR2d 299.

§ 34-1-113.
Acknowledgment of conveyances; generally.

Execution of deeds, mortgages or other conveyances of lands, or any interest in lands, shall be acknowledged by the party or parties executing same, before any notarial officer. The notarial officer taking such acknowledgment shall comply with the requirements of W.S.

32-3-109

.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 8; 1884, ch. 29, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 2741; Laws 1905, ch. 24, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 3633; C.S. 1920, § 4589; R.S. 1931, § 97-114; Laws 1941, ch. 79, § 1; 1943, ch. 76, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 66-108; W.S. 1957, § 34-13; Laws 1973, ch. 33, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2008, ch. 20, § 2; 2021 ch. 27, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to acknowledgment of townsites with reference to platting of subdivisions, etc., see §

34-12-103

.

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

As to issuance of certificate by notary public without proper acknowledgment, see §

6-5-114

.

As to notaries public, see title 32.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “justice of the peace” following “or any county clerk.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote the section.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "32-3-109" for "34-26-107" at the end of the second sentence.

Construction of former requirement that conveyance be witnessed. —

The requirement of R.S. 1931, § 97-114, that a conveyance of land should be executed in the presence of 1 witness who should subscribe as such, while necessary for recordation of the instrument, did not affect its validity as between the parties. Ohio Oil Co. v. Wyoming Agency, 63 Wyo. 187, 179 P.2d 773,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1947).

Validity between parties. —

This section does not affect the validity of an unwitnessed mortgage as between the parties. Conradt v. Lepper, 13 Wyo. 473, 81 P. 307,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 13 Wyo. 473, 81 P. 307,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1905).

Separate statement of wife. —

The failure of a certificate to state expressly that the wife was examined “separate and apart from her husband” did not render it void. Adams v. Smith, 11 Wyo. 200, 70 P. 1043,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1903).

Sufficiency on face. —

Where an instrument is sufficient on its face, it is entitled to be recorded, and imparts constructive notice to an execution creditor. Smith v. Jackson State Bank, 63 F.2d 934, 1933 U.S. App. LEXIS 3638 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1933).

Requirements not satisfied. —

Summary judgment in favor of a homeowner in an association's action seeking to enforce an amendment to a subdivision's restrictive covenants was affirmed because since not all of the signatures approving the amendment satisfied the requirements of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

34-1-113

, not all of the signatures were valid and thus, the amendment did not attain the 75 percent approval requirement necessary to enact the amendment.
Riverview Heights Homeowners' Ass'n v. Rislov, 2009 WY 55, 205 P.3d 1035,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2009).

Copies of Documents. —

When a title agency attempted to file a copy, with additional language, of an original document that had already been filed with the county clerk, the supreme court rejected the title agency's president's argument that the county clerk should have accepted the document for filing because, if the supreme court were to accept the argument, the door would be open to the filing of mere copies not eligible for recording. State Ex Rel. Bunn, 2005 WY 100, 117 P.3d 1253,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(2005).

Documents properly notarized. —

See Bowers Welding & Hotshot, Inc. v. Bromley, 699 P.2d 299,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 480

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted in

Star Valley Ranch Ass'n v. Daley, 2014 WY 116,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Sept. 17, 2014).

Applied

in

Thomas v. Roth, 386 P.2d 926,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1963).

Cited

in

Whalon v. North Platte Canal & Colonization Co., 11 Wyo. 313, 71 P. 995,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1903); Boswell v. First Nat'l Bank, 16 Wyo. 161, 92 P. 624,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(1907).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of certificate of acknowledgment, 25 ALR2d 1124.

Effect of acknowledgment of instrument upon determination of its character as will or deed, 31 ALR2d 532.

Record of instrument without sufficient acknowledgment as notice, 59 ALR2d 1299.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
131.02 (Matthew Bender).

§§ 34-1-114 through 34-1-117.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 20, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1890, ch. 61, § 2, Laws 1882, ch. 1, §§ 9 and 10, and Laws 1886, ch. 110, § 1, related to notification of expiration dates for conveyances and to conveyances executed outside the state.

§ 34-1-118.
Where conveyance to be recorded.

A certificate of the acknowledgment of any deed, mortgage or conveyance, or proof of the execution thereof, before a notarial officer, shall entitle such deed, mortgage or conveyance, certificate or certificates aforesaid, to be recorded in the office of the county clerk in the county where the land lies.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 12; R.S. 1887, § 15; R.S. 1899, § 2754; C.S. 1910, § 3646; C.S. 1920, § 4602; R.S. 1931, § 97-127; C.S. 1945, § 66-114; W.S. 1957, § 34-18; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2008, ch. 20, § 2.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring recordation of mortgage in connection with foreclosure and power of sale, see §

34-4-103

.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “county clerk” for “register of deeds.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “notarial officer” for “court of record or a justice of the peace, signed by the clerk of such court, (or by the justice) before whom the same was taken, as provided in this act, and in the cases where the same is necessary, the certificate required by W.S. 34-1-115.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1, generally deleted references to “justice of the peace”; presumably, failure to do so here was an oversight.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

An affidavit is not a “deed, mortgage or conveyance”

entitled to be recorded under this section. Thomas v. Roth, 386 P.2d 926,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1963).

Thus, affidavits are not eligible for recordation,

even if they have been sufficiently acknowledged. Thomas v. Roth, 386 P.2d 926,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1963).

Recording ineligible instrument does not give constructive notice. —

The recording of an instrument, which is not a proper subject of recordation, does not operate to give constructive notice of the contents of the instrument to prospective purchasers or encumbrancers of the property. Thomas v. Roth, 386 P.2d 926,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1963).

Nor does recording unacknowledged instrument. —

If an instrument, required for recordation to be acknowledged, is without an acknowledgment and is admitted to record, the recordation does not afford constructive notice of the existence and contents of the instrument. Thomas v. Roth, 386 P.2d 926,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1963).

Stated

in

Torgeson v. Connelly, 348 P.2d 63,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1959); Esterholdt v. Pacificorp, 2013 WY 64,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(May 22, 2013).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Nash v. Cowhick, 9 Wyo. 93, 60 P. 265,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1900).

Law reviews. —

For an article, “Recording the Land Contract,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 208.

For a note, “Wyoming Recording Statutes and the Bankruptcy Act,” see 7 Wyo. L.J. 109.

“A Possible Bar to Implied Covenants in Wyoming Oil and Gas Leases,” 11 Wyo. L.J. 57.

§ 34-1-119.
Duties of county clerk generally.

The county clerk of each county within this state shall receive and record at length all deeds, mortgages, conveyances, patents, certificates and instruments left with him for that purpose, and he shall endorse on every such instrument the day and hour on which it was filed for record. The county clerk shall not record any document until the address of the grantee, mortgagee or assignee of the mortgagee is furnished to the county clerk, but this requirement shall not affect the validity of the recording of any instrument except to the extent provided in W.S. 34-1-142(b). Only instruments which are the originally signed documents, including electronic documents recorded pursuant to the Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act, W.S.

34-1-401

through

34-1-407

, or properly certified or authenticated copies thereof may be properly recorded. A document is properly certified if in compliance with Rule 902 of the Wyoming Rules of Evidence or other applicable rule or statute.

Whenever a transfer on death deed is filed with the county clerk pursuant to W.S.

2-18-103

, the county clerk shall furnish the following information to the Wyoming department of health, division of healthcare financing within fourteen (14) days of recording the deed:

The name of the grantor;

The name of the grantee;

The legal description of the property being transferred.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 13; R.S. 1887, § 16; R.S. 1899, § 2760; C.S. 1910, § 3652; C.S. 1920, § 4608; R.S. 1931, § 97-133; C.S. 1945, § 66-115; W.S. 1957, § 34-19; Laws 1975, ch. 79, § 1; 1981, ch. 95, § 1; 2013 ch. 100, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 60, § 2, effective January 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 72, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (b), designating the existing provisions as (a).

The 2016 amendment,

effective January 1, 2017, inserted “including electronic documents recorded pursuant to the Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act, W.S.

34-1-401

through

34-1-407

,” following “originally signed documents” in (a).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) added “except to the extent provided in W.S. 34-1-142(b)” at the end of the second sentence.

Copies of Documents. —

District court properly refused to issue a writ of mandamus to a county clerk; a document that a title agency sought to file with the county clerk was merely a copy, with additions, of an original document that had already been filed with the clerk. State Ex Rel. Bunn, 2005 WY 100, 117 P.3d 1253,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(2005).

Quoted

in

Esterholdt v. Pacificorp, 2013 WY 64,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(May 22, 2013); Star Valley Ranch Ass'n v. Daley, 2014 WY 116,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Sept. 17, 2014).